sv: Storlek på rökträflis: Tjockt; Extra stor; Fint; Stor; Medium; Liten; Annat
fr: Taille des copeaux de fumage: Épais; Très grand; Fin; Grande; Moyen; Petite; Autre
lt-LT: Rūkymo drožlių dydis: Stambus; Ypač didelis; Plonas; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Kita
vi: Kích thước mảnh gỗ xông khói: Tóc thô; Cực lớn; Mảnh; Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Khác
ro-RO: Mărimea așchiilor de afumat: Grosieră; Extra mare; Fină; Mare; Medie; Mică; Altele
sk-SK: Veľkosť štiepok na údenie: Hrubé; Extra veľké; Jemné; Veľké; Stredné; Malé; Iné
tr: Tütsüleme talaşı boyutu: Kaba; Çok büyük; İnce; Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
hu: Füstölőforgács mérete: Durva; Extra nagy; Finom; Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
fi: Savustuslastun koko: Karkea; Erikoissuuri; Ohut; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Muu
zh-CN: 碎木块尺寸: 粗; 特大; 细; 大; 中; 小; 其他
th: ขนาดของชิ้นไม้รมควัน: หยาบ; ใหญ่พิเศษ; บาง; ใหญ่; ปานกลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
el: Μέγεθος ροκανιδιών ξύλου καπνίσματος: Χοντρό; Πολύ μεγάλο; Ψιλό; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικρό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tamanho da lasca para defumação: Espesso; Extragrande; Ralo; Grande; Médio; Pequena; Outro
nb: Størrelse på røykeflis: Grovt; Ekstra stor; Tynn; Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
en: Smoking chip size: Coarse; Extra large; Fine; Large; Medium; Small; Other
de: Größe der Räucherchips: Grob; Extra groß; Fein; Groß; Medium; Klein; Sonstiges
ru: Размер щепы для копчения: Крупная; Очень крупная; Очень мелкая; Стандартная; Средняя; Мелкая; Другая
bg-BG: Размер на дървесните стърготини за опушване: Груби; Екстра големи; Фини; Големи; Средни; Малки; Друго
hr-HR: Veličina komadića drva za dimljenje: Krupni; Ekstra veliki; Tanka; Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
ja: スモークチップのサイズ: 粗い; 特大; 微細; 大; 中; 小; その他
pl: Rozmiar chip do palenia: Grube; Bardzo duże; Drobne; Duże; Średnie; Małe; Inne
da: Rygeflisstørrelse: Groft; Ekstra stor; Fin; Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
cs: Velikost štěpky na uzení: Hrubé; Extra velké; Jemné; Velké; Střední velikost; Malé; Jiné
pt-PT: Tamanho das lascas para defumar: Grossa; Extra grande; Fina; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
it: Dimensioni trucioli affumicatura: Grosso; Extra grande; Fine; Large; Medio; Small; Altro
zh-TW: 煙燻木片尺寸: 粗; 特大; 細; 大; 中; 小; 其他
es: Tamaño de las astillas para ahumar: Grueso; Extragrande; Fino; Grande; Medio; Pequeño; Otros
nl: Grootte van rooksnippers: Grof; Extra groot; Fijn; Groot; Medium; Klein; Overig
sl-SI: Velikost sekancev za dimljenje: Grobo; Ekstra veliko; Fino; Velika; Srednja; Majhna; Drug
ko: 훈연 칩 크기: 거친; 엑스트라 라지; 파인; 라지; 중간; 스몰; 기타